Utah statutes.
41-6a-1805.   Penalty for violation.
(1) (a) A person who violates Section 41-6a-1803 is guilty of an infraction
and shall be fined a maximum of $45.
(b)  The court shall waive all but $15 of the fine for a violation of Section
41-6a-1803 if a person:
(i)  shows evidence of completion of a  two-hour course approved by the
commissioner of the Department of Public Safety that includes education on the
benefits of using a safety belt and child restraint device; and
(ii)  if the violation is for an offense under Subsection 41-6a-1803(1)(b),
submits proof of acquisition, rental, or purchase of a child restraint device.
(2)  Points for a motor vehicle reportable violation, as defined under Section
53-3-102, may not be assessed against a person for a violation of Section
41-6a-1803.
